California statutes. Penal Code
(c) This section does not preclude or prohibit prosecution under any other law, except that a person shall not be convicted for the same threat under both this section and Section 422.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

422.4.

(a) Any person who publishes information describing or depicting an academic researcher or his or her immediate family member, or the location or locations where an academic researcher or an immediate family member of an academic researcher may be found, with the intent that another person imminently use the information to commit a crime involving violence or a threat of violence against an academic researcher or his or her immediate family member, and the information is likely to produce the imminent commission of such a crime, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both a fine and imprisonment.

(b) For the purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Publishes” means making the information available to another person through any medium, including, but not limited to, the Internet, the World Wide Web, or e-mail.

(2) “Academic researcher” has the same meaning as in Section 602.12.

(3) “Immediate family” means any spouse, whether by marriage or not, domestic partner, parent, child, any person related by consanguinity or affinity within the second degree, or any other person who regularly resides in the household, or who, within the prior six months, regularly resided in the household.

(4) “Information” includes, but is not limited to, an image, film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, or any other computer-generated image.

(c) Any academic researcher about whom information is published in violation of subdivision (a) may seek a preliminary injunction enjoining any further publication of that information. This subdivision shall not apply to a person or entity protected pursuant to Section 1070 of the Evidence Code.

(d) This section shall not apply to any person who is lawfully engaged in labor union activities that are protected under state or federal law.

(e) This section shall not preclude prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 492, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11.6. CIVIL RIGHTS [422.55. - 422.94.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [422.55. - 422.57.]

422.55.

For purposes of this title, and for purposes of all other state law unless an explicit provision of law or the context clearly requires a different meaning, the following shall apply:

(a) “Hate crime” means a criminal act committed, in whole or in part, because of one or more of the following actual or perceived characteristics of the victim:

(1) Disability.

(2) Gender.

(3) Nationality.

(4) Race or ethnicity.

(5) Religion.

(6) Sexual orientation.

(7) Association with a person or group with one or more of these actual or perceived characteristics.

(b) “Hate crime” includes, but is not limited to, a violation of Section 422.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.56.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Association with a person or group with one or more of these actual or perceived characteristics” includes advocacy for, identification with, or being on the premises owned or rented by, or adjacent to, any of the following: a community center, educational facility, family, individual, office, meeting hall, place of worship, private institution, public agency, library, or other entity, group, or person that has, or is identified with people who have, one or more of the characteristics listed in the definition of “hate crime” under paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 422.55.

(b) “Disability” includes mental disability and physical disability, as defined in Section 12926 of the Government Code, regardless of whether those disabilities are temporary, permanent, congenital, or acquired by heredity, accident, injury, advanced age, or illness. This definition is declaratory of existing law.

(c) “Gender” means sex, and includes a person’s gender identity and gender expression. “Gender expression” means a person’s gender-related appearance and behavior regardless of whether it is stereotypically associated with the person’s assigned sex at birth.

(d) “In whole or in part because of” means that the bias motivation must be a cause in fact of the offense, whether or not other causes also exist. When
 multiple concurrent motives exist, the prohibited bias must be a substantial factor in bringing about the particular result. There is no requirement that the bias be a main factor, or that the crime would not have been committed but for the actual or perceived characteristic. This subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law under In re M.S. (1995) 10 Cal.4th 698 and People v. Superior Court (Aishman) (1995) 10 Cal.4th 735.

(e) “Nationality” means country of origin, immigration status, including citizenship, and
 national origin. This definition is declaratory of existing law.

(f) “Race or ethnicity” includes ancestry, color, and ethnic background.

(g) “Religion” includes all aspects of religious belief, observance, and practice and includes agnosticism and atheism.

(h) “Sexual orientation” means heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality.

(i) “Victim” includes, but is not limited to, a community center, educational facility, entity, family, group, individual, office, meeting hall, person, place of worship, private institution, public agency, library, or other victim or intended victim of the offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 295, Sec. 1.   (AB 600)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

422.57.

For purposes this code, unless an explicit provision of law or the context clearly requires a different meaning, “gender” has the same meaning as in Section 422.56.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Crimes and Penalties [422.6. - 422.865.]

422.6.

(a) A person, whether or not acting under color of law, shall not, by force or threat of force, willfully injure, intimidate, interfere with, oppress, or threaten any other person in the free exercise or enjoyment of a right or privilege secured by the Constitution or laws of this state or by the Constitution or laws of the United States in whole or in part because of one or more of the actual or perceived characteristics of the victim listed in subdivision (a) of Section 422.55.

(b) A person, whether or not acting under color of law, shall not knowingly deface, damage, or destroy the real or personal property of any other person for the purpose of
 intimidating or interfering with the free exercise or enjoyment of a right or privilege secured by the Constitution or laws of this state or by the Constitution or laws of the United States, in whole or in part because of one or more of the actual or perceived characteristics of the victim listed in subdivision (a) of Section 422.55.

(c) A person convicted of violating subdivision (a) or (b) shall be punished either by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the above imprisonment and fine, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170. In addition to that punishment, the court shall order the defendant to perform a minimum of community service, not to exceed 400 hours, to be performed over a period not to exceed 350 days, during a time other
 than the person’s hours of employment or school attendance. However, a person shall not be convicted of violating subdivision (a) based upon speech alone, except upon a showing that the speech itself threatened violence against a specific person or group of persons and that the defendant had the apparent ability to carry out the threat.

(d) Conduct that violates this and any other law, including, but not limited to, an offense described in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11410) of Chapter 3 of Title 1 of Part 4, may be charged under all applicable provisions. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this section and another law shall not be punished under more than one law, and the penalty to be imposed shall be determined as set forth in Section 654.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 821, Sec. 2.   (AB 2099)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

422.7.

Except in the case of a person punished under Section 422.6, any hate crime that is not made punishable by imprisonment in the state prison shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, if the crime is committed against the person or property of another for the purpose of intimidating or interfering with that other person’s free exercise or enjoyment of any right secured to him or her by the Constitution or laws of this state or by the Constitution or laws of the United States under any of the following circumstances, which shall be charged in the accusatory pleading:

(a) The crime against the person of another either includes the present ability to commit a violent injury or causes actual physical injury.

(b) The crime against property causes damage in excess of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950).

(c) The person charged with a crime under this section has been convicted previously of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 422.6, or has been convicted previously of a conspiracy to commit a crime described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 422.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 352.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

422.75.

(a) Except in the case of a person punished under Section 422.7, a person who commits a felony that is a hate crime or attempts to commit a felony that is a hate crime, shall receive an additional term of one, two, or three years in the state prison, at the court’s discretion.

(b) Except in the case of a person punished under Section 422.7 or subdivision (a) of this section, any person who commits a felony that is a hate crime, or attempts to commit a felony that is a hate crime, and who voluntarily acted in concert with another person, either personally or by aiding and abetting another person, shall receive an additional two, three, or four years in the state prison, at the court’s discretion.

(c) For the purpose of imposing an additional term under subdivision (a) or (b), it shall be a factor in aggravation that the defendant personally used a firearm in the commission of the offense. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a court from also imposing a sentence enhancement pursuant to Section 12022.5, 12022.53, or 12022.55, or any other law.

(d) A person who is punished pursuant to this section also shall receive an additional term of one year in the state prison for each prior felony conviction on charges brought and tried separately in which it was found by the trier of fact or admitted by the defendant that the crime was a hate crime. This additional term shall only apply where a sentence enhancement is not imposed pursuant to Section 667 or 667.5.

(e) Any additional term authorized by this section shall not be imposed unless the allegation is charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(f) Any additional term imposed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other punishment provided by law.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court may strike any additional term imposed by this section if the court determines that there are mitigating circumstances and states on the record the reasons for striking the additional punishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.76.

Except where the court imposes additional punishment under Section 422.75 or in a case in which the person has been convicted of an offense subject to Section 1170.8, the fact that a person committed a felony or attempted to commit a felony that is a hate crime shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1170.75 by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.77.

(a) Any willful and knowing violation of any order issued pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 52.1 of the Civil Code shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) A person who has previously been convicted one or more times of violating an order issued pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 52.1 of the Civil Code upon charges separately brought and tried shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one year. Subject to the discretion of the court, the prosecution
 shall have the opportunity to present witnesses and relevant evidence at the time of the sentencing of a defendant pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) The prosecuting agency of each county shall have the primary responsibility for the enforcement of orders issued pursuant to Section 52.1 of the Civil Code.

(d) The court may order a defendant who is convicted of a hate crime to perform a minimum of community service, not to exceed 400 hours, to be performed over a period not to exceed 350 days, during a time other than their hours of employment or school
 attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 434, Sec. 3.   (SB 827)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

422.78.

The prosecuting agency of each county shall have the primary responsibility for the enforcement of orders issued pursuant to this title or Section 52.1 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.8.

Except as otherwise required by law, nothing in this title shall be construed to prevent or limit the prosecution of any person pursuant to any provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 839, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

422.85.

(a) In the case of any person who is convicted of any offense against the person or property of another individual, private institution, or public agency, committed because of the victim’s actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, religion, nationality, country of origin, ancestry, disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, including, but not limited to, offenses defined in Section 302, 423.2, 594.3, 11411, 11412, or 11413, or for any hate crime, the court, absent compelling circumstances stated on the record, shall make an order protecting the victim, or known immediate family or domestic partner of the victim, from further acts of violence, threats, stalking, or harassment by the defendant, including any
 stay-away conditions the court deems appropriate, and shall make obedience of that order a condition of the defendant’s probation. In these cases the court may also order that the defendant be required to do one or more of the following as a condition of probation:

(1) Complete a class or program on racial or ethnic sensitivity, or other similar training in the area of civil rights, or a one-year counseling program intended to reduce the tendency toward violent and antisocial behavior if that class, program, or training is available and was developed or authorized by the court or local agencies in cooperation with organizations serving the affected community.

(2) Make payments or other compensation to a community-based program or local agency that provides services to victims of hate violence.

(3) Reimburse the
 victim for reasonable costs of counseling and other reasonable expenses that the court finds are the direct result of the defendant’s acts.

(b) Any payments or other compensation ordered under this section shall be in addition to restitution payments required under Section 1203.04, and shall be made only after that restitution is paid in full.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 719, Sec. 32.   (AB 887)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

422.86.

(a) It is the public policy of this state that the principal goals of sentencing for hate crimes, are the following:

(1) Punishment for the hate crimes committed.

(2) Crime and violence prevention, including prevention of recidivism and prevention of crimes and violence in prisons and jails.

(3) Restorative justice for the immediate victims of the hate crimes and for the classes of persons terrorized by the hate crimes.

(b) The Judicial Council shall develop a rule of court guiding hate crime sentencing to implement the policy in subdivision (a). In developing the rule of court, the council shall consult experts including organizations representing hate crime victims.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.865.

(a) In the case of any person who is committed to a state hospital or other treatment facility under the provisions of Section 1026 for any offense against the person or property of another individual, private institution, or public agency because of the victim’s actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, religion, nationality, country of origin, ancestry, disability, gender, or sexual orientation, including, but not limited to, offenses defined in Section 302, 423.2, 594.3, 11411, 11412, or 11413, or for any hate crime, and then is either placed on outpatient status or conditional release from the state hospital or other treatment facility, the court or community program director may order that the defendant be required as a condition of outpatient status or conditional release to complete a class or program on racial or ethnic sensitivity, or other similar training in the area of civil rights, or a one-year counseling program intended to reduce the tendency toward violent and antisocial behavior if that class, program, or training is available and was developed or authorized by the court or local agencies in cooperation with organizations serving the affected community.

(b) In the case of any person who is committed to a state hospital or other treatment facility under the provisions of Section 1026 for any offense against the person or property of another individual, private institution, or public agency committed because of the victim’s actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, religion, nationality, country of origin, ancestry, disability, gender, or sexual orientation, including, but not limited to, offenses defined in Section 302, 423.2, 594.3, 11411, 11412, or 11413, or for any hate crime, and then is either placed on outpatient status or conditional release from the state hospital or other treatment facility, the court, absent compelling circumstances stated on the record, shall make an order protecting the victim, or known immediate family or domestic partner of the victim, from further acts of violence, threats, stalking, or harassment by the defendant, including any stay-away conditions as the court deems appropriate, and shall make obedience of that order a condition of the defendant’s outpatient status or conditional release.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage state agencies and treatment facilities to establish education and training programs to prevent violations of civil rights and hate crimes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 809, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Law Enforcement Agency Policies [422.87. - 422.87.]

422.87.

(a) Each state and local law enforcement agency shall, by July 1, 2024, adopt a hate crimes policy that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The definitions in Sections 422.55 and 422.56.

(2) The content of the model policy framework that the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training developed pursuant to Section 13519.6, and any content that the commission may revise or add in the future, including any policy, definitions, response and reporting responsibilities, training resources, the supplemental hate crime report, and planning and prevention methods.

(3) (A) Information
 regarding bias motivation.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “bias motivation” is a preexisting negative attitude toward actual or perceived characteristics referenced in Section 422.55. Depending on the circumstances of each case, bias motivation may include, but is not limited to, hatred, animosity, discriminatory selection of victims, resentment, revulsion, contempt, unreasonable fear, paranoia, callousness, thrill-seeking, desire for social dominance, desire for social bonding with those of one’s “own kind,” or a perception of the vulnerability of the victim due to the victim being perceived as being weak, worthless, or fair game because of a protected characteristic, including, but not limited to, disability or gender.

(C) (i) In recognizing suspected disability-bias hate crimes, the policy shall instruct officers to consider whether there is any
 indication that the perpetrator was motivated by hostility or other bias, occasioned by factors such as, but not limited to, dislike of persons who arouse fear or guilt, a perception that persons with disabilities are inferior and therefore “deserving victims,” a fear of persons whose visible traits are perceived as being disturbing to others, or resentment of those who need, demand, or receive alternative educational, physical, or social accommodations.

(ii) In recognizing suspected disability-bias hate crimes, the policy also shall instruct officers to consider whether there is any indication that the perpetrator perceived the victim to be vulnerable and, if so, if this perception is grounded, in whole or in part, in antidisability bias. This includes, but is not limited to, if a perpetrator targets a person with a particular perceived disability while avoiding other vulnerable-appearing persons such as inebriated persons or persons with
 perceived disabilities different than those of the victim, those circumstances could be evidence that the perpetrator’s motivations included bias against persons with the perceived disability of the victim and that the crime must be reported as a suspected hate crime and not a mere crime of opportunity.

(D) In recognizing suspected religion-bias hate crimes, the policy shall instruct officers to consider whether there were targeted attacks on, or biased references to, symbols of importance to a particular religion or articles considered of spiritual significance in a particular religion. Examples of religions and such symbols and articles include, but are not limited to:

(i) In Buddhism, statues of the Buddha.

(ii) In Christianity, crosses.

(iii) In
 Hinduism, forehead markings, known as bindis and tilaks, Aum/Om symbols, and images of deities known as murtis.

(iv) In Islam, hijabs.

(v) In Judaism, Stars of David, menorahs, and yarmulke.

(vi) In Sikhism, turbans, head coverings, and unshorn hair, including beards.

(4) Information regarding the general underreporting of hate crimes and the more extreme underreporting of antidisability and antigender hate crimes and a plan for the agency to remedy this underreporting.

(5) A protocol for reporting suspected hate crimes to the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 13023.

(6) A checklist of first responder
 responsibilities, including, but not limited to, being sensitive to effects of the crime on the victim, determining whether any additional resources are needed on the scene to assist the victim or whether to refer the victim to appropriate community and legal services, and giving the victims and any interested persons the agency’s hate crimes brochure, as required by Section 422.92.

(7) A specific procedure for transmitting and periodically retransmitting the policy and any related orders to all officers, including a simple and immediate way for officers to access the policy in the field when needed.

(8) The title or titles of the officer or officers responsible for ensuring that the department has a hate crime brochure as required by Section 422.92 and ensuring that all officers are trained to distribute the brochure to all suspected hate crime victims and all other interested
 persons.

(9) A requirement that all officers be familiar with the policy and carry out the policy at all times unless directed by the chief, sheriff, director, or other chief executive of the law enforcement agency or other command-level officer to whom the chief executive officer formally delegates this responsibility.

(10) A schedule of the hate crime training required by Section 13519.6 and any other hate crime or related training the agency may conduct.

(b) A law enforcement agency that updates an existing hate crimes policy or adopts a new hate crimes policy may include any of the provisions of a model hate crime policy and other relevant documents developed by the International Association of Chiefs of Police that are relevant to California and consistent with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 449)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Provisions [422.88. - 422.94.]

422.88.

(a) The court in which a criminal proceeding stemming from a hate crime or alleged hate crime is filed shall take all actions reasonably required, including granting restraining orders, to safeguard the health, safety, or privacy of the alleged victim, or of a person who is a victim of, or at risk of becoming a victim of, a hate crime.

(b) Restraining orders issued pursuant to subdivision (a) may include provisions prohibiting or restricting the photographing of a person who is a victim of, or at risk of becoming a victim of, a hate crime when reasonably required to safeguard the health, safety, or privacy of that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.89.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage counties, cities, law enforcement agencies, and school districts to establish education and training programs to prevent violations of civil rights and hate crimes and to assist victims.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.9.

All state and local agencies shall use the definition of “hate crime” set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 422.55 exclusively, except as other explicit provisions of state or federal law may require otherwise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.91.

The Department of Corrections and the California Youth Authority, subject to available funding, shall do each of the following:

(a) Cooperate fully and participate actively with federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies and community hate crime prevention and response networks and other anti-hate groups concerning hate crimes and gangs.

(b) Strive to provide inmates with safe environments in which they are not pressured to join gangs or hate groups and do not feel a need to join them in self-defense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.92.

(a) Every state and local law enforcement agency in this state shall make available a brochure on hate crimes to victims of these crimes and the public.

(b) The Civil Rights Department shall provide existing brochures, making revisions as needed, to local law enforcement agencies upon request for reproduction and distribution to victims of hate crimes and other interested parties. In carrying out these responsibilities, the department shall consult the
 Civil Rights Council, the Department of Justice, and the California Victim Compensation Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 71.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

422.93.

(a) It is the public policy of this state to protect the public from crime and violence by encouraging all persons who are victims of or witnesses to crimes, or who otherwise can give evidence in a criminal investigation, to cooperate with the criminal justice system and not to penalize these persons for being victims or for cooperating with the criminal justice system.

(b) Whenever an individual who is a victim of or witness to a hate crime, or who otherwise can give evidence in a hate crime investigation, is not charged with or convicted of committing any crime under state law, a peace officer may not detain the individual exclusively for any actual or suspected immigration violation or report or turn the individual over to federal immigration authorities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

422.94.

(a) The Hate Crime Vertical Prosecution Pilot Grant Program (HCVP) is hereby created to be administered by the Department of Justice.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2023, and subject to an appropriation of funds by the Legislature, the department shall award grants to prosecutorial agencies for the purpose of creating, supporting, or expanding vertical prosecution units for the prosecution of hate crimes. These units shall be primarily focused on better serving hate crime victims and achieving just, equitable, and appropriate resolutions to hate crime cases.

(c) One-time HCVP grants shall be made on a competitive basis to selected applicants in a manner and in an amount determined by the
 department.

(d) The department shall do all of the following to administer the grant program:

(1) Specify the form of the application and information required to be submitted by each applicant.

(2) Specify the criteria the department shall consider in selecting grant awardees.

(3) Select the number of awards to be granted.

(e) The department may use no more than 5 percent of the funds appropriated for HCVP for the costs of administering the program. Grant awardees shall not use grant funds to supplant existing spending for vertical prosecutions of hate crimes.

(f) By no later than July 1, 2028, each grant recipient shall
 prepare and submit a report to the department, in a form prescribed by the department, that includes any relevant data requested by the department.

(g) By no later than January 1, 2029, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code summarizing the data provided by grant recipients and analyzing the effectiveness of vertical prosecution programs in better serving hate crime victims and achieving just, equitable, and appropriate resolutions to hate crime cases, and making policy recommendations to the Legislature.

(h) The department shall make evaluations of the grant program available to the public.

(i) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Prosecutorial agency” means a district attorney, city attorney, or other governmental entity responsible for the prosecution of crimes within a local jurisdiction.

(2) “Vertical prosecution” refers to having the same individual prosecutor assigned to a case from the initial criminal investigation through the sentencing of the offender.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 853, Sec. 1.   (AB 557)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of July 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11.7. CALIFORNIA FREEDOM OF ACCESS TO CLINIC AND CHURCH ENTRANCES ACT [423. - 423.6.]

423.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the California Freedom of Access to Clinic and Church Entrances Act, or the California FACE Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 899, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

423.1.

The following definitions apply for the purposes of this title:

(a) “Crime of violence” means an offense that has as an element the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the person or property of another.

(b) “Interfere with” means to restrict a person’s freedom of movement.

(c) “Intimidate” means to place a person in reasonable apprehension of bodily harm to themselves or to another.

(d) “Nonviolent” means conduct that would not constitute a crime of violence.

(e) “Physical obstruction” means rendering ingress to or egress from a reproductive health services facility or to or from a place of religious worship impassable to another person, or rendering passage to or from a reproductive health services facility or a place of religious worship unreasonably difficult or hazardous to another person.

(f) “Reproductive health services” means reproductive health services provided in a hospital, clinic, physician’s office, or other facility and includes medical, surgical, counseling, or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy or the termination of a pregnancy.

(g) “Reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant” means a person or entity, including, but not limited to, employees, staff, volunteers, and third-party vendors, that is or was involved in
 obtaining, seeking to obtain, providing, seeking to provide, or assisting or seeking to assist another person, at that other person’s request, to obtain or provide services in a reproductive health services facility, or a person or entity that is or was involved in owning or operating or seeking to own or operate, a reproductive health services facility.

(h) “Reproductive health services facility” includes a hospital, clinic, physician’s office, or other facility that provides or seeks to provide reproductive health services and includes the building or structure in which the facility is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 191, Sec. 5.   (AB 1356)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

423.2.

Every person who, except a parent or guardian acting towards their minor child or ward, commits any of the following acts shall be subject to the punishment specified in Section 423.3.

(a) By force, threat of force, or physical obstruction that is a crime of violence, intentionally injures, intimidates, interferes with, or attempts to injure, intimidate, or interfere with, any person or entity because that person or entity is a reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant, or in order to intimidate a person or entity, or a class of persons or entities, or from becoming or remaining a reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant.

(b) By force, threat of
 force, or physical obstruction that is a crime of violence, intentionally injures, intimidates, interferes with, or attempts to injure, intimidate, or interfere with a person lawfully exercising or seeking to exercise the First Amendment right of religious freedom at a place of religious worship.

(c) By nonviolent physical obstruction, intentionally injures, intimidates, or interferes with, or attempts to injure, intimidate, or interfere with, any person or entity because that person or entity is a reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant, or in order to intimidate any person or entity, or any class of persons or entities, from becoming or remaining a reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant.

(d) By nonviolent physical obstruction, intentionally injures, intimidates, or interferes with, or attempts to injure, intimidate, or interfere with, a
 person lawfully exercising or seeking to exercise the First Amendment right of religious freedom at a place of religious worship.

(e) Intentionally damages or destroys the property of a person, entity, or facility, or attempts to do so, because the person, entity, or facility is a reproductive health services patient, provider, assistant, or facility.

(f) Intentionally damages or destroys the property of a place of religious worship.

(g) Within 100 feet of the entrance to, or within, a reproductive health services facility, intentionally videotapes, films, photographs, or records by electronic means, a reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant without that person’s consent with specific intent to intimidate the person from becoming or remaining a reproductive health services patient, provider, or
 assistant, and thereby causes the person to be intimidated.

(h) In any manner or forum, including, but not limited to, internet websites and social media, intentionally discloses or distributes a videotape, film, photograph, or recording knowing it was obtained in violation of subdivision (g) with the specific intent to intimidate the person from becoming or remaining a reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant, and thereby causes the person to be intimidated. For purposes of this subdivision, “social media” means an electronic service or account, or electronic content, including, but not limited to, videos or still photographs, blogs, video blogs, podcasts, instant and text messages, email, online services or accounts, or internet website profiles or locations.

(i) Subdivisions (g) and (h) do not apply to a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 2 of
 Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 191, Sec. 6.   (AB 1356)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

423.3.

(a) A first violation of subdivision (c), (d), (g), or (h) of Section 423.2 is a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, or a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by
 both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) A second or subsequent violation of subdivision (c), (d), (g), or (h) of Section 423.2 is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or a fine not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) A first violation of subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 423.2 is a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or a fine not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) A first violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 423.2 is a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year,